Utah statutes.
53A-11-803.   Investigation of complaint -- Confidentiality -- Immunity.

(1) (a)  The reporting and investigation requirements of Title 62A, Chapter 4a, Part 4, Child Abuse or Neglect Reporting Requirements, apply to complaints on corporal punishment.

(b)  If a violation is confirmed, school authorities shall take prompt and appropriate action, including in-service training and other administrative action, to ensure against a repetition of the violation.

(2)  Reports made on violations of this part are subject to the same requirements of confidentiality as provided under Section 62A-4a-412.

(3)  Any school or individual who in good faith makes a report or cooperates in an investigation by a school or authorized public agency concerning a violation of this part is immune from any civil or criminal liability that might otherwise result by reason of those actions.

